Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1015.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) In order to preserve access to the state's medicaid health
services, Colorado must prioritize essential health-care coverage for the
most vulnerable populations in the state;
(b) Low-income children and families, the elderly, and individuals
with disabilities rely on medicaid as an essential service that is a lifeline;
(c) In pursuit of sustaining long-term funding for the state's
medicaid health services for Colorado citizens, the state must correctly
allocate funding to essential health services that have a direct impact on
Colorado citizens' health;
(d) Health first Colorado, Colorado's medicaid program, should
not cover elective procedures. It should only cover procedures that are
medically necessary for Colorado citizens.
(e) Previously, due to insufficient data, the state was unable to
-2- HB25B-1015

accurately estimate the costs of Cover All Coloradans, OmniSalud,
abortion, and gender mutilation. These fiscal impacts have led to a large
discrepancy between the estimated costs and the true impact on health
coverage for Colorado citizens.
(f) Now, it is estimated that the state has spent $51 million on
Cover All Coloradans, $90 million on OmniSalud, $6 million on
abortions, and $4.5 million on gender mutilation, totaling over $150
million that could otherwise be spent on Colorado citizens;
(g) While over $150 million is spent on elective procedures for
individuals and health-care coverage for undocumented individuals,
Colorado is anticipating a 28% increase in premiums in 2026; and
(h) Although Amendment 79 permits the use of public funds for
abortion, it does not explicitly require public funds to be used for
abortion.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that state medicaid
funding must not be used for abortion or gender mutilation for an
individual, or health services for an undocumented individual. These
limitations will protect Colorado's commitment to prioritizing and
protecting essential health-care coverage for the most vulnerable
populations in the state and supporting the ethical use of taxpayer dollars
that align with the state's core values.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-4-415.5 as
follows:
25.5-4-415.5. Prohibition on reimbursement for abortion or
gender-affirming health-care services - prohibition on
reimbursement for medical services to a person who is not lawfully
residing - definitions. (1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE
-3- HB25B-1015

CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "ABORTION" MEANS ANY MEDICAL PROCEDURE, INSTRUMENT,
AGENT, OR DRUG USED TO TERMINATE THE PREGNANCY OF AN INDIVIDUAL
KNOWN OR REASONABLY BELIEVED TO BE PREGNANT WITH AN INTENTION
OTHER THAN TO INCREASE THE PROBABILITY OF A LIVE BIRTH.
(b) "GENDER-AFFIRMING HEALTH-CARE SERVICES" MEANS ANY
DIAGNOSTIC, THERAPEUTIC, PHARMACOLOGICAL, PROCEDURAL, OR OTHER
CARE THAT LEADS TO OR INVOLVES PUBERTY BLOCKERS, CROSS-SEX
HORMONES, OR SURGERY FOR THE PURPOSE OF AFFIRMING A GENDER
OTHER THAN THE PATIENT'S BIOLOGICAL SEX.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW TO THE CONTRARY, THE STATE
DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT REIMBURSE A HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER WHO, OR
AN ENTITY OR FACILITY THAT, PERFORMS, ASSISTS IN PERFORMING, OR
REFERS A PERSON TO ABORTION OR GENDER-AFFIRMING HEALTH-CARE
SERVICES. THIS SUBSECTION (2) DOES NOT PROHIBIT REIMBURSEMENT FOR
THERAPEUTIC SERVICES THAT ARE NOT FOR THE PURPOSE OF AFFIRMING A
GENDER OTHER THAN THE PERSON'S BIOLOGICAL SEX FOR AN ADULT OR
FOR A PERSON WHO IS UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OF AGE IF THE PERSON'S
PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN PROVIDES CONSENT AND GUIDANCE TO THE
THERAPEUTIC SERVICES.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW TO THE CONTRARY, THE STATE
DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT REIMBURSE A HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER, ENTITY,
OR FACILITY FOR PROVIDING MEDICAL SERVICES TO A PERSON UNLESS THE
PERSON IS A CITIZEN OR NATIONAL OF THE UNITED STATES OR IS
LAWFULLY RESIDING.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-109, repeal
(1)(a.7) and (1)(a.8); and repeal as it will become effective January 1,
-4- HB25B-1015

2026, (1)(a.9) as follows:
24-75-109. Controller may allow expenditures in excess of
appropriations - limitations - appropriations for subsequent fiscal
year restricted - repeal. (1) For the purpose of closing the state's books,
and subject to the provisions of this section, the controller may, on or
after May 1 of any fiscal year and before the forty-fifth day after the close
thereof, upon approval of the governor, allow any department, institution,
or agency of the state, including any institution of higher education, to
make an expenditure in excess of the amount authorized by an item of
appropriation for such fiscal year if:
(a.7) The overexpenditure is by the department of health care
policy and financing for the state medical assistance program, established
pursuant to section 25.5-2-104; or
(a.8) The overexpenditure is by the department of health care
policy and financing for the state children's basic health plan, established
pursuant to section 25.5-2-105; or
(a.9) The overexpenditure is by the department of health care
policy and financing for abortion care services provided pursuant to
sections 25.5-2-106 and 25.5-8-107 (1)(a)(VI); or
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-1-201, repeal
(1)(f.5) as follows:
25.5-1-201. Programs to be administered by the department
of health care policy and financing. (1) The state department shall
administer the following programs and perform the following functions:
(f.5) The reproductive health-care program that provides
reproductive health-care services, as specified in section 25.5-2-103;
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-201, amend
-5- HB25B-1015

(1) as follows:
25.5-4-201. Cash system of accounting - financial
administration of medical services premiums - medical programs
administered by department of human services - federal
contributions - rules. (1) The state department shall utilize the cash
system of accounting, as enunciated by the governmental accounting
standards board, regardless of the source of revenues involved, for all
activities of the state department relating to the financial administration
of any nonadministrative expenditure that qualifies for federal financial
participation under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", and for
the administration of the state-funded health and medical care program,
created pursuant to section 25.5-2-104, and for the state children's basic
health plan, created pursuant to section 25.5-2-105, except for
expenditures under the program for the medically indigent, article 3 of
this title 25.5.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-412, amend
as it will become effective January 1, 2026, (2)(a)(IV) as follows:
25.5-4-412. Family planning services - family-planning-related
services - rules - definitions. (2) As used in this section, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(a) "Family-planning-related services" means services provided
in a family planning setting as part of or as a follow-up to a family
planning visit, including:
(IV) Any other medical diagnosis, treatment, or preventive service
that is routinely provided pursuant to a family planning visit. including
abortion care.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-503, amend
-6- HB25B-1015

(2) as follows:
25.5-4-503. Waiver applications - authorization. (2) The state
department shall pursue and, if approved, implement a demonstration
waiver that authorizes the state to use federal medical assistance
payments authorized pursuant to section 1903(v) of the federal "Social
Security Act", as amended, in coordination with the division of insurance
to enhance or expand a state-subsidized individual health coverage plan
as defined in section 10-16-1203 (15). and, only if needed to maximize
federal financial participation, for Coloradans receiving state medical
assistance pursuant to section 25.5-2-104 or 25.5-5-201 (6). To the extent
such federal funds are used to enhance or expand a state-subsidized
individual health coverage plan, as defined in section 10-16-1203 (15),
the health insurance affordability enterprise created pursuant to section
10-16-1204 must receive, deposit into the health insurance affordability
cash fund created in section 10-16-1206, and allocate the federal share of
the medical assistance payments pursuant to section 10-16-1205 (2),
subject to any conditions set forth in the approval of the waiver.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-103, amend
(3)(a) as follows:
25.5-5-103. Mandated programs with special state provisions
- rules. (3) (a) Emergency medical assistance shall MUST be provided to
any person who is not a citizen of the United States, including
undocumented aliens, aliens who are not qualified aliens, and qualified
aliens who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, who has
A QUALIFIED ALIEN WITH an emergency medical condition and meets one
of the categorical requirements set forth in section 25.5-5-101. except that
such persons shall not be required to meet any residency requirement
-7- HB25B-1015

other than that required by federal law.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-201, repeal
(6) as follows:
25.5-5-201. Optional provisions - optional groups - rules.
(6) (a) Beginning no later than January 1, 2025, a pregnant person who
is not a citizen and who is not eligible for medical assistance pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section is eligible to receive medical assistance
pursuant to this subsection (6)(a) if the individual meets the eligibility
requirements other than those related to citizenship and immigration
status.
(b) A pregnant person who is eligible for medical assistance
pursuant to this subsection (6) remains continuously eligible for all
medical services pursuant to the medical assistance program for the
twelve-month postpartum period, so long as eligibility remains in effect
pursuant to subsection (4.5)(a) of this section.
(c) The state department shall seek any necessary federal
approvals to maximize any available federal financial participation in
implementing this subsection (6). Benefits for services obtained pursuant
to this subsection (6) must be provided with only state funds if federal
financial participation is unavailable for such services.
(d) (I) During its 2024 presentation to the joint budget committee
of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human
services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee
of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the
hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement
for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government
Act", the state department shall report on its plans and progress in
-8- HB25B-1015

implementing the coverage expansion created pursuant to this subsection
(6).
(II) Beginning January 1, 2026, and continuing every January
thereafter, the state department, in its presentation to the joint budget
committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health
and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance
committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees,
at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State
Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART)
Government Act", shall report on the cost savings and health
improvements associated with the coverage expansion created pursuant
to this subsection (6).
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-329, amend
as it will become effective January 1, 2026, (1)(b)(IV) as follows:
25.5-5-329. Family planning services - federal authorization
- rules - definitions. (1) As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(b) "Family-planning-related services" means services provided
in a family planning setting as part of or as a follow-up to a family
planning visit, including:
(IV) Any other medical diagnosis, treatment, or preventive service
that is routinely provided pursuant to a family planning visit. including
abortion care.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-335, amend
(2)(a), (2)(b), and (7)(b) as follows:
25.5-5-335. Continuous medical coverage for children and
adults feasibility study - federal authorization - rules - report -
-9- HB25B-1015

definition. (2) At a minimum, the feasibility study must consider the
costs; implementation factors, including county workload, training, and
administrative burdens on the counties, information technology systems,
upgrades, and associated costs; potential health benefits for individuals
and communities, including disadvantaged and marginalized groups;
impacts of increased use of preventive and high-value health services;
administrative savings, including, but not limited to, reducing or
eliminating eligibility processing for populations during the continuous
eligibility period; reductions in administrative turnover and coverage loss;
and, to the extent practicable, social and economic impacts with respect
to the following:
(a) Allowing an eligible child, as defined in this article 5 and
articles 2, 3, 6, and 8 of this title 25.5, including children eligible under
sections 25.5-2-104 and 25.5-2-105, to remain continuously eligible for
medical assistance and the children's basic health plan for twenty-four
months after the last day of the month in which the child was enrolled;
(b) Allowing an eligible child, as defined in this article 5 and
articles 2, 3, 6, and 8 of this title 25.5, including children eligible under
sections 25.5-2-104 and 25.5-2-105 who are less than six years of age, to
remain continuously eligible for medical assistance or the children's basic
health plan without regard to a change in household income until the child
reaches six years of age;
(7) (b) For purposes of seeking federal authorization pursuant to
subsection (7)(a) of this section, an eligible child is, as defined in this
article 5 and articles 2, 3, 6, and 8 of this title 25.5, including a child
eligible pursuant to sections 25.5-2-104 and 25.5-2-105, and must be
under three years of age. An eligible child shall remain continuously
-10- HB25B-1015

eligible without regard to household income until the eligible child
reaches three years of age; except that a child is no longer eligible and
must be disenrolled from a medical assistance program if the state
department becomes aware that the child has moved out of the state, the
state department or county possesses facts indicating that the family has
requested the child's voluntary disenrollment, the state department
determines eligibility was erroneously granted, or the child is deceased.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-103, amend
(4)(a)(I) and (4)(b)(I) as follows:
25.5-8-103. Definitions - rules. As used in this article 8, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(4) "Eligible person" means:
(a) (I) A person who is less than nineteen years of age, who is a
citizen or meets the immigration status requirements set forth in section
25.5-8-109 (6), or 25.5-8-109 (7), whose family income does not exceed
two hundred sixty percent of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family
size, and who is not eligible for medical assistance pursuant to articles 4,
5, and 6 of this title 25.5.
(b) (I) A pregnant person who is a citizen or meets the
immigration status requirements set forth in section 25.5-8-109 (6), or
25.5-8-109 (7), whose family income does not exceed two hundred sixty
percent of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family size, and who is
not eligible for medical assistance pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of this
title 25.5.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-107, repeal
(1)(i); and repeal as it will become effective January 1, 2026, (1)(a)(VI)
as follows:
-11- HB25B-1015

25.5-8-107. Duties of the department - schedule of services -
premiums - copayments - subsidies - purchase of childhood
immunizations. (1) In addition to any other duties pursuant to this article
8, the department has the following duties:
(a) (VI) In addition to the items specified in subsections (1)(a)(I),
(1)(a)(II), (1)(a)(III), and (1)(a)(V) of this section, and any additional
items approved by the medical services board, on and after January 1,
2026, the medical services board shall include abortion care in the
schedule of health-care services for all enrolled pregnant persons.
(i) (I) The department shall develop and implement an outreach
strategy for Coloradans who become eligible for health coverage pursuant
to section 25.5-2-104, 25.5-2-105, 25.5-5-201 (6), or 25.5-8-109 (7). The
state department shall work with stakeholders to develop an outreach
strategy that includes:
(A) Funding for community-based organizations to partner with
the department on outreach;
(B) A method for providing information related to eligibility and
enrollment that can be provided to nonprofit partners, school districts, and
charter schools for outreach purposes; and
(C) At a minimum, providing information related to eligibility and
coverage in English, Spanish, and in each language spoken by at least
two-and-one-half percent of the population of any county who speak
English less than very well, as defined by the United States bureau of the
census American community survey, and who speak the minority
language at home;
(II) Approximately twelve and twenty-four months after
implementation of the strategy required pursuant to subsection (1)(i)(I) of
-12- HB25B-1015

this section, the department shall convene stakeholders, including directly
impacted individuals, service providers, and advocacy organizations that
are diverse with regard to race, ethnicity, immigration status, sexual
orientation, and gender identity and who are affected by higher rates of
health disparities and inequities. The department shall report on the
outreach and enrollment strategy outcomes, including enrollment of
eligible persons into these programs compared to those persons who are
eligible for coverage, but not enrolled.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-109, repeal
(7) as follows:
25.5-8-109. Eligibility - children - pregnant women - rules.
(7) (a) Beginning no later than January 1, 2025, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the department shall provide benefits pursuant to
this article 8 to a pregnant person who is not a citizen and is not eligible
pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, so long as the pregnant person
meets the eligibility criteria other than those related to citizenship or
immigration status. Eligibility pursuant to this section extends
continuously through the twelve-month postpartum period, so long as
eligibility remains in effect pursuant to subsection (5.5)(a) of this section.
(b) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to
maximize any available federal financial participation in implementing
this subsection (7).
(c) (I) During its 2024 presentation to the joint budget committee
of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human
services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee
of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the
hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement
-13- HB25B-1015

for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government
Act", the state department shall report on its plans and progress in
implementing the coverage expansion created pursuant to this subsection
(7).
(II) Beginning January 1, 2026, and continuing every January
thereafter, the state department, in its presentation to the joint budget
committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health
and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance
committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees,
at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State
Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART)
Government Act", shall report on the cost savings and health
improvements associated with the coverage expansion created pursuant
to this subsection (7).
(d) This subsection (7) constitutes state authority within the
meaning of 8 U.S.C. sec. 1621 (d), as that law existed on January 1, 2022.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-109.3,
repeal (1) as follows:
25.5-8-109.3. Health services initiatives. (1) To the extent
federal financial participation is available, the department shall design
and implement health service initiatives pursuant to section
2105(a)(1)(D)(ii) of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, to
provide funding for continuous enrollment for the twelve-month
postpartum period for a person who is enrolled in health-care coverage
pursuant to section 25.5-5-201 (6) or 25.5-8-109 (7).
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 25.5-2-103,
25.5-2-104, 25.5-2-105, and 25.5-2-106.
-14- HB25B-1015

SECTION 17. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-15- HB25B-1015